ko: 램프 품질 등급: 애프터 마켓; 호환; OEM 전구 호환 하우징; 오리지널; 리퍼비시 OEM; 기타
sv: Lampkvalitetsgrad: Eftermarknad; Kompatibel; OEM-lampa med kompatibelt hölje; Original; Renoverad OEM; Övrigt
lt-LT: Lempos kokybės klasė: Antrinė rinka; Suderinamas; OEM lemputė su suderinamu korpusu; Originalus; Atnaujintas OEM; Kita
it: Grado di qualità della lampada: Aftermarket; Compatibile; Lampadina OEM con alloggiamento compatibile; Originale; OEM ricondizionato; Altro
nl: Lamp kwaliteitsklasse: Aftermarket; Compatibel; OEM-lamp met compatibele behuizing; Origineel; Gereviseerde OEM; Andere
th: เกรดคุณภาพหลอดไฟ: ตลาดหลังการขาย; ใช้ร่วมได้; หลอด OEM พร้อมโคมที่เข้ากันได้; ต้นฉบับ; OEM ที่ปรับปรุงใหม่; อื่นๆ
fr: Niveau de qualité de la lampe: Marché secondaire; Compatible; Ampoule OEM avec boîtier compatible; Original; OEM remis à neuf; Autre
cs: Třída kvality lampy: Aftermarket; Kompatibilní; OEM žárovka s kompatibilním pouzdrem; Originál; Renovovaná OEM; Jiné
sk-SK: Trieda kvality lampy: Trh s náhradnými dielmi; Kompatibilný; OEM žiarovka s kompatibilným púzdrom; Originál; Repasovaná OEM; Iné
pt-BR: Grau de qualidade da lâmpada: Pós-venda; Compatível; Lâmpada OEM com alojamento compatível; Original; OEM recondicionado; Outro
tr: Lamba kalite sınıfı: Satış sonrası; Uyumlu; Uyumlu muhafazalı OEM ampul; Orijinal; Yenilenmiş OEM; Diğer
bg-BG: Клас на качеството на лампата: Следпродажбено обслужване; Съвместима; OEM крушка със съвместим корпус; Оригинален; Ремонтирана OEM; Други
en: Lamp quality grade: Aftermarket; Compatible; OEM bulb with compatible housing; Original; Refurbished OEM; Other
nb: Lampekvalitetsgrad: Ettermarked; Kompatibel; OEM-pære med kompatibelt hus; Original; Renovert OEM; Annet
zh-CN: 灯泡质量等级: 二级市场; 兼容; 原厂灯泡配兼容灯架; 原创; 翻新原厂; 其他
pt-PT: Grau de qualidade da lâmpada: Mercado pós-venda; Compatível; Lâmpada OEM com caixa compatível; Original; OEM recondicionado; Outro
vi: Cấp chất lượng đèn: Không chính hãng; Tương thích; Bóng OEM với vỏ tương thích; Nguyên bản; OEM tân trang; Khác
hr-HR: Razred kvalitete lampe: Aftermarket; Kompatibilan; OEM žarulja s kompatibilnim kućištem; Izvornik; Obnovljeni OEM; Ostalo
hu: Lámpaminőségi besorolás: Utángyártott; Kompatibilis; OEM izzó kompatibilis házzal; Eredeti; Felújított OEM; Egyéb
ja: ランプ品質グレード: アフターマーケット; 互換性; OEM電球と互換ハウジング; オリジナル; リファービッシュOEM; その他
da: Lampe-kvalitetsgrad: Eftermarked; Kompatibel; OEM-pære med kompatibel holder; Original; Renoveret OEM; Andet
ro-RO: Clasa de calitate a lămpii: Aftermarket; Compatibil; Bec OEM cu carcasă compatibilă; Original; OEM recondiționat; Altele
de: Lampen-Qualitätsstufe: Zubehörmarkt; Kompatibel; OEM-Lampe mit kompatiblem Gehäuse; Original; Aufbereitetes OEM; Sonstiges
sl-SI: Razred kakovosti žarnice: Poprodajni trg; Združljiv; OEM žarnica z združljivim ohišjem; Izvoren; Obnovljeno OEM; Drugo
ru: Качество лампы: Неоригинальный; Совместимый; OEM-лампа с совместимым корпусом; Оригинал; Восстановленная OEM; Другой
pl: Klasa jakości lampy: Rynek wtórny; Kompatybilny; Żarówka OEM z kompatybilną obudową; Oryginalny; Odnowiona OEM; Inne
zh-TW: 燈泡品質等級: 售後市場; 相容; OEM 燈泡配相容燈座; 原生; 翻新 OEM; 其他
fi: Lampun laatuluokka: Jälkimarkkinat; Yhteensopiva; OEM-polttimo yhteensopivalla kotelolla; Alkuperäinen; Kunnostettu OEM; Muu
el: Βαθμός ποιότητας λάμπας: Αγορά μη αυθεντικών ανταλλακτικών και εξαρτημάτων; Συμβατό; Γνήσιος λαμπτήρας OEM με συμβατό περίβλημα; Αυθεντικό; Ανακατασκευασμένη OEM; Άλλο
es: Grado de calidad de la lámpara: Posventa; Compatible; Bombilla OEM con carcasa compatible; Original; OEM reacondicionado; Otros